Utah statutes.
48-3a-1203.   Agreement to be liable.

Notwithstanding Section 48-3a-304, or a contrary provision in an operating agreement, a member or manager may agree to be obligated personally for any or all of the debts, obligations, or liabilities of one or more series.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

